apertium-sat.sat.dix
<?xml version="1.0" encoding="UTF-8"?>
<dictionary>

  <!-- Define the alphabet below. -->
  <alphabet>ᱚᱛᱜᱝᱞᱟᱠᱡᱢᱣᱤᱥᱦᱧᱨᱩᱪᱫᱬᱭᱮᱯᱰᱱᱲᱳᱴᱵᱶᱷᱸᱹᱻᱽᱼ</alphabet>

  <sdefs>
    <!-- Define symbol definitions within <sdef> here. -->
    <sdef n="n" 	c="Noun"/>
    <sdef n="num_noun" 	c="Number noun"/>
    <sdef n="np" 	c="Proper name"/> 
    <sdef n="pr" 	c="Preposition"/> 
    <sdef n="vblex" 	c="Verb"/> 
    <sdef n="vbmod" 	c="Modal verb"/> 
    <sdef n="vaux" 	c="Auxiliary verb"/> 
    <sdef n="vbser" 	c="Verb 'to be'"/> 
    <sdef n="vbhaver" 	c="Verb 'to have'"/> 
    <sdef n="vbdo" 	c="Verb 'to do'"/>
	<sdef n="tv"     c="transitive"/> 	
    <sdef n="det" 	c="Determiner"/> 
    <sdef n="predet" 	c="Predeterminer"/> 
    <sdef n="prn" 	c="Pronoun"/> 
    <sdef n="cnjcoo" 	c="Coordinating conjunction"/> 
    <sdef n="cnjsub" 	c="Subordinating conjunction"/> 
    <sdef n="p1" 	c="First person"/> 
    <sdef n="p2" 	c="Second person"/> 
    <sdef n="p3" 	c="Third person"/> 
    <sdef n="attr" 	c="Attributive"/> 
    <sdef n="sg" 	c="Singular"/> 
	<sdef n="du" 	c="Dual"/>
    <sdef n="pl" 	c="Plural"/> 
    <sdef n="sp" 	c="Singular / plural"/> 
    <sdef n="m" 	c="Masculine"/> 
    <sdef n="f" 	c="Feminine"/> 
    <sdef n="mf" 	c="Masculine / feminine"/> 
    <sdef n="nt" 	c="Neuter"/> 
    <sdef n="mfn" 	c="Masculine / feminine / neuter"/> 
    <sdef n="def" 	c="Definite"/> 
    <sdef n="ind" 	c="Indefinite"/> 
    <sdef n="ref" 	c="Reflexive"/> 
    <sdef n="dem" 	c="Demonstrative"/> 
    <sdef n="top" 	c="Toponym"/> 
    <sdef n="al" 	c="Altres (other)"/> 
    <sdef n="ant" 	c="Anthroponym (first name)"/> 
    <sdef n="cog" 	c="Cognomen (family name)"/> 
	<sdef n="post"    c="Postposition"/>    
    <sdef n="prs" 	c="Present subjunctive"/> 
    <sdef n="pres" 	c="Present (tense)"/> 
    <sdef n="past" 	c="Past"/> 
    <sdef n="pii" 	c="Past indicative"/> 
    <sdef n="pis" 	c="Past subjunctive"/> 
    <sdef n="imp" 	c="Imperative"/> 
    <sdef n="inf" 	c="Infinitive"/> 
    <sdef n="pp" 	c="Past participle"/> 
    <sdef n="subs" 	c="Verbal noun"/> 
    <sdef n="pprs" 	c="Present participle"/> 
    <sdef n="ger" 	c="Gerund"/> 
    <sdef n="cm" 	c="Comma"/> 
    <sdef n="sent" 	c="End of sentence marker"/> 
    <sdef n="quot" 	c="Quote mark"/> 
    <sdef n="lquot" 	c="Quote mark left"/> 
    <sdef n="rquot" 	c="Quote mark right"/> 
    <sdef n="abbr" 	c="Abbreviation"/> 
    <sdef n="adj" 	c="Adjective"/> 
    <sdef n="adv" 	c="Adverb"/> 
    <sdef n="preadv" 	c="Pre-adverb"/> 
    <sdef n="rel" 	c="Relative"/> 
    <sdef n="itg" 	c="Interrogative"/> 
    <sdef n="cnjadv" 	c="Adverbial conjunction"/> 
    <sdef n="comp" 	c="Comparative"/> 
    <sdef n="sup" 	c="Superlative"/> 
    <sdef n="pred" 	c="Predicative"/> 
    <sdef n="ord" 	c="Ordinal"/> 
    <sdef n="qnt" 	c="Quantifier"/> 
    <sdef n="num" 	c="Numeral / Number"/> 
    <sdef n="pron" 	c="Pronoun"/> 
    <sdef n="ij" 	c="Interjection"/> 
    <sdef n="lpar" 	c="Left parenthesis"/> 
    <sdef n="rpar" 	c="Right parenthesis"/> 
    <sdef n="apos" 	c="Apostrophe"/> 
    <sdef n="percent" 	c="Percentage"/> 
    <sdef n="guio" 	c="Hyphen"/> 
    <sdef n="sep" 	c="Seperable verb"/> 
    <sdef n="sint" 	c="Synthetic adjective"/> 
    <sdef n="nom" 	c="Nominative"/> 
	<sdef n="obl"     c="Oblique"/>
    <sdef n="gen" 	c="Genitive"/> 
    <sdef n="acr" 	c="Acronym"/> 
    <sdef n="org" 	c="Organisation"/> 
    <sdef n="tn" 	c=""/> 
    <sdef n="nn" 	c=""/> 
    <sdef n="aa" 	c="Animate"/> 
    <sdef n="an" 	c="Inanimate"/> 
    <sdef n="pos" 	c="Possessive"/> 
    <sdef n="lquest" 	c="left question mark"/> 
    <sdef n="obj" 	c="Object"/> 
    <sdef n="subj" 	c="Subject"/> 
    <sdef n="pers" 	c="Personal (pronoun)"/> 
    <sdef n="file" 	c="Filename"/>
    <sdef n="web" 	c="Links and Emails"/>
    <sdef n="muc"	c="Muchad"/>  
  </sdefs>

  <pardefs>
    <!-- Define paradigms within <pardef> here. -->


<pardef n="hd-hour">
    <e><re>[0-9]</re></e>
    <e><re>[01][0-9]</re></e>
    <e><re>2[0-3]</re></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="hd-separator">
    <e><i>:</i></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="hd-minute">
    <e><re>[012345][0-9]</re></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="hour-digital">
    <e><par n="hd-hour"/><par n="hd-separator"/><par n="hd-minute"/><p><l></l><r><s n="num"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="symbols">
    <e>       <p><l></l>      <r><s n="num"/></r></p></e>

    <e>       <p><l>%</l>     <r>%<s n="num"/></r></p></e>
    <e r="LR"><p><l><b/>%</l> <r>%<s n="num"/></r></p></e>
  
    <e>       <p><l>°</l><r>°<s n="num"/></r></p></e>
    <e r="LR"><p><l>º</l><r>°<s n="num"/></r></p></e>
    <e r="LR"><p><l><b/>º</l><r>°<s n="num"/></r></p></e>

    <e>       <p><l><b/>°C</l><r><b/>°C<s n="num"/></r></p></e>
    <e r="LR"><p><l>°C</l>    <r><b/>°C<s n="num"/></r></p></e>
    <e r="LR"><p><l><b/>ºC</l><r><b/>°C<s n="num"/></r></p></e>
    <e r="LR"><p><l>ºC</l>    <r><b/>°C<s n="num"/></r></p></e>
    <e r="LR"><p><l>°<b/>C</l><r><b/>°C<s n="num"/></r></p></e>
    <e r="LR"><p><l><b/>º<b/>C</l><r><b/>°C<s n="num"/></r></p></e>
    <e r="LR"><p><l>º<b/>C</l><r><b/>°C<s n="num"/></r></p></e>

</pardef>

<pardef n="ordinals">
    <e>       <re>[1-9]</re><p><l>.º</l>          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="ord"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    <e>       <re>[1-9]</re><p><l>.ª</l>          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="ord"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    <e>       <re>[1-9]</re><p><l>.os</l>         <r><s n="adj"/><s n="ord"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    <e>       <re>[1-9]</re><p><l>.as</l>         <r><s n="adj"/><s n="ord"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    <e>       <re>[1-9]+[0-9]+</re><p><l>.º</l>    <r><s n="adj"/><s n="ord"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    <e>       <re>[1-9]+[0-9]+</re><p><l>.ª</l>    <r><s n="adj"/><s n="ord"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    <e>       <re>[1-9]+[0-9]+</re><p><l>.os</l>   <r><s n="adj"/><s n="ord"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    <e>       <re>[1-9]+[0-9]+</re><p><l>.as</l>   <r><s n="adj"/><s n="ord"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

    <e r="LR"><re>[1-9]</re><p><l>º</l>           <r><s n="adj"/><s n="ord"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    <e r="LR"><re>[1-9]</re><p><l>ª</l>           <r><s n="adj"/><s n="ord"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    <e r="LR"><re>[1-9]</re><p><l>os</l>          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="ord"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    <e r="LR"><re>[1-9]</re><p><l>as</l>          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="ord"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    <e r="LR"><re>[1-9]+[0-9]+</re><p><l>º</l>     <r><s n="adj"/><s n="ord"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    <e r="LR"><re>[1-9]+[0-9]+</re><p><l>ª</l>     <r><s n="adj"/><s n="ord"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    <e r="LR"><re>[1-9]+[0-9]+</re><p><l>os</l>    <r><s n="adj"/><s n="ord"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    <e r="LR"><re>[1-9]+[0-9]+</re><p><l>as</l>    <r><s n="adj"/><s n="ord"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  
</pardef>


	<!-- SECTION: Punctuation -->      

<pardef n="numeros">
    <e>       <re>[0-9]+([.,][0-9]+)?</re><par n="symbols"/></e>
    <e>       <re>[0-9]+([.,][0-9]+)+</re><p><l></l><r><s n="num"/></r></p></e> <!--1.600.894-->
</pardef>

<pardef n="codes" c="CIF, carreteras, etc.">
    <e>       <re>[0-9]+[A-Z]+|[A-Z]+[0-9]+|[0-9]+[A-Z]+[0-9]+|[A-Z]+[0-9]+[A-Z]+</re></e>
</pardef>


	
<pardef n="separa">
    <e>	      <re>[.\?;:!]</re><p><l/><r><s n="sent"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="separ">
    <e>       <re>[¿¡]</re><p><l></l><r><s n="lquest"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="guio">
    <e>	      <re>[—\-]+</re><p><l></l><r><s n="guio"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="apost">
    <e>	      <re>'</re><p><l></l><r><s n="apos"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="coma">
      <e><re>,</re><p><l></l><r><s n="cm"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="muchad">
      <e><re>᱾</re><p><l></l><r><s n="muc"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<e>                      <par n="hour-digital"/></e>
<e>                      <par n="numeros"/></e>
<e>                      <par n="codes"/></e>
<e>                      <par n="ordinals"/></e>
<e>                      <par n="separa"/></e>
<e>                      <par n="coma"/></e>
<e>                      <par n="muchad"/></e>
<e>			 <par n="numeros"/></e>
<e>			 <par n="guio"/></e>
<e r="RL">               <par n="apost"/></e>
<e>                      <par n="separ"/></e>
